Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1123.
do enact as follows:SB1123,11Section 1. 104.001 of the statutes is repealed.SB1123,22Section 2. 104.01 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1123,2,63104.01 (1g) “Consumer price index” means the average of the consumer price 4index over each 12-month period for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, all 5items, not seasonally adjusted, as determined by the bureau of labor statistics of the 6U.S. department of labor.SB1123,37Section 3. 104.01 (6m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1123,2,98104.01 (6m) “Small employer” means an employer that employs 50 or fewer 9employees.SB1123,410Section 4. 104.01 (5g) of the statutes is repealed.SB1123,511Section 5. 104.035 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB1123,3,21104.035 Minimum wage; established. (1) Employees generally. Except 2as provided in subs. (2) to (4), the minimum wage is as follows:SB1123,3,43(a) For wages earned after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts 4date], but before January 1, 2027, $15 per hour.SB1123,3,65(b) Except as provided in par. (c), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 62027, and ending on December 31, 2027, $16.25 per hour.SB1123,3,87(c) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 8January 1, 2027, and ending on December 31, 2027, $15.75 per hour.SB1123,3,109(d) Except as provided in par. (e), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 102028, and ending on December 31, 2028, $17.50 per hour.SB1123,3,1211(e) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 12January 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2028, $16.50 per hour.SB1123,3,1413(f) Except as provided in par. (g), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 142029, and ending on December 31, 2029, $18.75 per hour.SB1123,3,1615(g) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 16January 1, 2029, and ending on December 31, 2029, $17.25 per hour.SB1123,3,1817(h) Except as provided in par. (i), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 182030, and ending on December 31, 2030, $20 per hour.SB1123,3,2019(i) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 20January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2030, $18 per hour.SB1123,3,2221(j) Except as provided in pars. (k) to (n), for wages earned beginning on 22January 1, 2031, the amount determined by the department under sub. (5).SB1123,4,21(k) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 2January 1, 2031, and ending on December 31, 2031, $18.75 per hour.SB1123,4,43(L) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 4January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2032, $19.50 per hour.SB1123,4,65(m) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 6January 1, 2033, and ending on December 31, 2033, $20 per hour.SB1123,4,87(n) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 8January 1, 2034, the amount determined under par. (j).SB1123,4,109(2) Tipped employees. Except as provided in subs. (3) and (4), the minimum 10wage for tipped employees is as follows:SB1123,4,1211(a) Except as provided in par. (b), for wages earned after the effective date of 12this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], but before January 1, 2027, $7.50 per hour.SB1123,4,1513(b) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer after the effective 14date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], but before January 1, 2027, $6.50 per 15hour.SB1123,4,1716(c) Except as provided in par. (d), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 172027, and ending on December 31, 2027, $8 per hour.SB1123,4,1918(d) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 19January 1, 2027, and ending on December 31, 2027, $7 per hour.SB1123,4,2120(e) Except as provided in par. (f), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 212028, and ending on December 31, 2028, $8.50 per hour.SB1123,4,2322(f) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 23January 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2028, $7.50 per hour.SB1123,5,21(g) Except as provided in par. (h), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 22029, and ending on December 31, 2029, $9 per hour.SB1123,5,43(h) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 4January 1, 2029, and ending on December 31, 2029, $8 per hour.SB1123,5,65(i) Except as provided in par. (j), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 62030, and ending on December 31, 2030, $9.50 per hour.SB1123,5,87(j) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 8January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2030, $8.50 per hour.SB1123,5,109(k) Except as provided in par. (L), for wages earned beginning on January 1, 102031, and ending on December 31, 2031, $10 per hour.SB1123,5,1211(L) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 12January 1, 2031, and ending on December 31, 2031, $9 per hour.SB1123,5,1513(m) Except as provided in pars. (n) to (p), for wages earned beginning on 14January 1, 2032, one-half the amount determined by the department under sub. (1) 15(j).SB1123,5,1716(n) For wages earned by an employee of a small employer beginning on 17January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2032, $9.50 per hour. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1123 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1123 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1123 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1123 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1123: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting